Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1450XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1450XD (3) 91
sb/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 476.91, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
476.91 Alternative operator Telecommunication services for
incarcerated persons.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
a. “Alternative operator services company” means a
nongovernmental company which receives more than half of
its Iowa intrastate telecommunications services revenues
from calls placed by end-user customers from telephones
other than ordinary residence or business telephones. The
definition is further limited to include only companies which
provide operator assistance, either through live or automated
intervention, on calls placed from other than ordinary
residence or business telephones, and does not include services
provided under contract to rate-regulated local exchange
utilities.
b. “Contracting entity” means an entity providing telephones
other than ordinary residence or business telephones for use
by end-user customers which has contracted with an alternative
operator services company to provide telecommunications
services to those telephones.
c. “End-user customer” means a person who places a local or
toll call.
d. “Other than ordinary residence or business telephones”
means telephones other than the residence or business
telephones of the customary users of the telephones, including
but not limited to pay telephones and telephones in motel,
hotel, hospital, and college dormitory rooms.
a. “Correctional facility” means a county jail, municipal
holding facility, secure facility for the detention or
custody of juveniles, community-based correctional facility,
institution under the management of the department of
corrections, or other similar private, local, state, or
federally operated institutions, whether operated within this
LSB 1450XD (3) 91
-1- sb/js 1/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
state or another state.
b. “Incarcerated person calling service” means a service
that allows incarcerated persons to make calls to individuals
outside the correctional facility where the incarcerated person
is being held, regardless of the technology used to deliver the
service.
2. Jurisdiction. Notwithstanding any finding by the
commission that a service or facility is subject to competition
and should be deregulated pursuant to section 476.1, all
intrastate telecommunications services provided by alternative
operator services companies to end-user customers, using
other than ordinary residence or business telephones,
All incarcerated person calling services are subject to
the jurisdiction of the commission and shall be rendered
pursuant to tariffs approved by the commission. Alternative
operator services companies Incarcerated person calling
service providers shall be subject to all requirements and
sanctions provided in this chapter. Contracting entities
Correctional facilities shall be subject to the requirements
of any commission regulations concerning telecommunications
services provided by alternative operator services companies
incarcerated persons calling service providers.
3. Requirements. The commission shall adopt and enforce
requirements for the provision of services by alternative
operator services companies and contracting entities
incarcerated person calling service providers to correctional
facilities.
4. Billing by local exchange utilities. Notwithstanding
any finding by the commission that a service or facility is
subject to competition and should be deregulated pursuant
to section 476.1, a regulated local exchange utility shall
not perform billing and collection functions relating
to regulated telecommunications services provided by an
alternative operator services company, unless the alternative
operator services company has filed a statement with the local
LSB 1450XD (3) 91
-2- sb/js 2/4

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
exchange utility signed by a corporate officer, or other
authorized person having personal knowledge, that all regulated
telecommunications services to be billed shall be rendered
pursuant to tariffs approved by the commission.
Sec. 2. Section 478.7, Code 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
478.7 Form of franchise.
The general counsel for the utilities commission shall
prepare a blank form of A franchise, which issued pursuant to
this chapter shall provide space for a general description
of the improvement authorized, the name and address of the
person or corporation to whom granted, the general terms and
conditions upon which the franchise is granted, and other
things information as necessary. This blank form shall be
filled out and signed by the chairperson of the utilities
commission which grants the franchise, and the official seal
shall be attached. The franchise is subject to regulations and
restrictions as the general assembly prescribes, and to rules,
not inconsistent with statutes, as the utilities commission may
establish.